Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds received as reimbursement from the United States Department  of Transportation,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Maintenance and emergency
relief programs ......................... $ 701,966
(2) Preservation program ............... $ 2,807,865
(3) Bridge program......................... $ 8,189,605
(4) Operations program .................. $ 11,000,000
(5) Modernization program............. $ 13,000,000
(6) Special programs....................... $ 12,018,390
(7) Local government program ....... $ 7,000,000
(8) Driver and motor vehicle
services ..................................... $ 450,014
(9) Transportation program
development.............................. $ 479,690
(10) Public transit ............................ $ 51,497,620
(11) Central services ........................ $ 3,744,785
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $389,122
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds received as reimbursement from the United States Department  of Transportation,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected  or re-
ceived by the Department of Environmental  Quality, for permitting and program implemen-
tation.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for administration from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 1
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate  Bill 5535),
collected or received by  the Department of Revenue, is increased by $510,500 for implemen-
tation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 2017).
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for the business division from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts and reimbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5535), collected or received by the Department of Revenue, is increased by $615,200 for  im-
plementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 2017).
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,747,420 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in  this section, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for
the core system replacement program and implementation of chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 2017).
SECTION 6.
This 2017 Act is first operative on  the effective date of chapter __, Oregon
Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 2017).
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 2